Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.340

Coordination of county administrative programs—Duties incident to.

The county commissioners shall take such action as is necessary to effect coordination of their administrative programs and prepare reports annually on the operations of all departments under their jurisdiction.

[ 1998 c 245 s 27; 1963 c 4 s 36.32.340. Prior: 1939 c 188 s 2; RRS s 4077-3.]